Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.020

Incorporators.

One or more individuals, partnerships, corporations or governmental bodies or agencies may incorporate a corporation by signing and delivering articles of incorporation in duplicate to the secretary of state.

[ 1982 c 35 s 119; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.